Maryland, session 2026, HB1438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–205.1.
(b) (1) The State Board shall establish high school curriculum, college and
career readiness standards, and graduation requirements for all public schools in
accordance with this section.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1438*

HOUSE BILL 1438
(2) The State Board shall coordinate and consult with the Maryland Higher
Education Commission, the Governor’s Workforce Development Board, the Maryland
Association of Community Colleges, and the Accountability and Implementation Board in
performing its duties under this subsection.
(3) AT LEAST EVERY 5 YEARS THE STATE BOARD SHALL:
(I) REVIEW AND UPDATE GRADUATION REQUIREMENTS; AND
(II) IMPLEMENT CHANGES TO GRADUATION REQUIREMENTS
FOR THE COHORT ENTERING HIGH SCHOOL IN THE SCHOOL YEAR FOLLOWING
STATE BOARD APPROVAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.